Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1816.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pet Shop-Kennel Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agent." A person, as defined in section 102 of the Dog Law, who is authorized by the Dog Law to process applications for dog license certificates and issue dog license certificates and tags."Boarding kennel." As follows:1234567891011121314151617 (1) An establishment available to the general public where a dog, cat or rabbit is housed for compensation by the day, week or a specified or unspecified time.(2) The term includes:(i) A boarding facility operated by a licensed doctor of veterinary medicine whether or not the boarding facility is on the same premises as a building or structure subject to the provisions of the Veterinary Medicine Practice Act.(ii) An establishment available to the general public that, for consideration, takes control of a dog, cat or rabbit from the owner for a portion of a day for the purposes of exercise, day care or entertainment of the dog, cat or rabbit.(3) The term does not include:(i) A kennel where the practice of veterinary medicine is performed if the kennel is covered by the provisions of the Veterinary Medicine Practice Act.(ii) An establishment engaged only in the grooming or training of dogs, cats or rabbits.(4) For the purpose of this term, each time that a dog, cat or rabbit enters the kennel, the animal shall be counted as one dog, cat or rabbit."Cat." The genus and species known as Felis catus."Dealer." A person that:(1) publicly or privately sells or offers for sale a dog, cat or rabbit belonging to another person for consideration, including a fee, commission or percentage of the sale price;(2) transfers dogs, cats or rabbits at wholesale for 20250HB1816PN2237 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resale to another person; or(3) offers or maintains dogs, cats or rabbits at wholesale for resale to another person."Department." The Department of Agriculture of the Commonwealth."Dog." The genus and species known as Canis familiaris."Dog Law." The act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law."Establishment." As follows:(1) The premises on, in or through which a dog, cat or rabbit is kept, bred, harbored, boarded, sheltered, maintained, sold, given away, exchanged or in any way transferred.(2) The term encompasses all of the following on, in or through which any of the activities under paragraph (1) take place:(i) The home, homestead, place of business or operation of a person, including a dealer, which includes all of the land, property, housing facilities or any combination of land, property or housing facilities of the person.(ii) All of the individuals residing in or on the establishment.(iii) A person, organization, business or operation which utilizes offsite or rescue network kennel homes to keep, maintain, breed, train, harbor, board, shelter, sell, give away, adopt, exchange or in any way transfer dogs, cats or rabbits.(3) The term does not include a gathering of dog, cat or rabbit owners in which dogs, cats and rabbits remain in the 20250HB1816PN2237 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 custody and care of their owners, including:(i) A hotel or campground.(ii) A place for grooming or training.(iii) An event, including a dog, cat or rabbit show or performance event, a field trial or a hunting event."Housing facility." A structure that provides animals with shelter, protection from the elements and protection from temperature extremes."Humane society or association." A nonprofit society or association that:(1) Is duly incorporated in accordance with 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 53 Subch. A (relating to incorporation generally) for the purpose of the prevention of cruelty to animals.(2) Has a licensed physical kennel facility that can house a minimum of 10 animals.(3) Is not located on a residential property."Kennel." As follows:(1) For dogs, either of the following:(i) An establishment in or through which at least 26 dogs are kept or transferred in a calendar year.(ii) A boarding kennel.(2) For cats or rabbits, either of the following:(i) An establishment:(A) in or through which cats or rabbits are kept or transferred; and(B) for which a license is required under applicable law, based on specified numbers of cats or rabbits or other criteria, prior to January 1, 2027.(ii) A boarding kennel."Licensed doctor of veterinary medicine." A person who is 20250HB1816PN2237 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 currently licensed in accordance with the Veterinary Medicine Practice Act."Owner." When applied to the proprietorship of a dog, cat or rabbit, a person that:(1) has a right of property in the dog, cat or rabbit;(2) keeps or harbors the dog, cat or rabbit;(3) has the dog, cat or rabbit in the person's care; or(4) permits the dog, cat or rabbit to remain on or about the premises occupied by the person."Pet shop-kennel." A kennel or person that acquires and sells dogs, cats or rabbits for the purpose of resale, whether as owner, agent or consignee, and sells or offers to sell the dogs, cats or rabbits on a retail basis."Police officer." As follows:(1) An individual:(i) who is employed or elected by this Commonwealth or a municipality of this Commonwealth; and(ii) whose duty includes preserving the peace, making arrests or enforcing the law.(2) The term includes a constable or deputy constable."Rabbit." As follows:(1) A domesticated or pet rabbit.(2) The term does not include a rabbit intended for human consumption."Rescue network kennel." A kennel that utilizes rescue network kennel homes with the goal of ultimately transferring the dog, cat or rabbit to a permanent owner or keeper through any means of transfer."Rescue network kennel home." An establishment to which a rescue network kennel assigns a dog, cat or rabbit until the 20250HB1816PN2237 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dog, cat or rabbit is ultimately transferred to a permanent home."State dog warden." An employee of the department whose primary duty is to enforce the Dog Law and the regulations promulgated in accordance with the Dog Law."Veterinary Medicine Practice Act." The act of December 27, 1974 (P.L.995, No.326), known as the Veterinary Medicine Practice Act.Section 3. Licenses and conduct.(a) Issuance or renewal prohibited.--(1) For dogs, the department may not issue or renew a pet shop-kennel license under the Dog Law after December 31, 2026.(2) For cats and rabbits, a license required under applicable law for a kennel may not be issued or renewed after December 31, 2026.(b) Construction.--(1) Subject to paragraph (2), subsection (a) shall not be construed to prohibit a pet shop-kennel from offering space to a humane society or association or a rescue network kennel for the purpose of showcasing adoptable animals to the public.(2) Fees for the showcasing of adoptable animals under paragraph (1), including adoption fees, may not be paid to the pet shop-kennel.(c) Required and prohibited actions.--(1) This subsection applies to:(i) For dogs, a person holding a pet shop-kennel license in accordance with the Dog Law, which was issued or renewed prior to January 1, 2027.20250HB1816PN2237 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) For cats and rabbits, a pet shop-kennel operating under a license required under applicable law for a kennel, which was issued or renewed prior to January 1, 2027.(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, a person or pet shop-kennel described under paragraph (1):(i) Shall immediately cease and desist from operating the kennel, including buying, exchanging, selling, offering for sale, giving away or in any way transferring cats or rabbits.(ii) Except as permitted under subsection (b)(1), may not acquire additional dogs, cats or rabbits or increase the number of dogs, cats or rabbits in the kennel by any means, including breeding.(iii) Must permit a State dog warden, a police officer and any other person otherwise authorized by law to inspect the kennel without a warrant in order to determine compliance with an order of the department, any relevant court order and any provision of this act.Section 4. Penalties.(a) Offense defined.--Failure to comply with this act, in addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, may result in imposition by the department of an administrative penalty of not less than $100 nor more than $500 per day for each violation. Each dog, cat or rabbit shall count as one violation.(b) Grading.--A violation of this act shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.20250HB1816PN2237 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829